Czech.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +1 +2 +3 +Sg +Pl +Nom +Acc +Gen +Dat +Loc +Ins +Voc +Masc +Fem +Neut

Definitions
V = a|e|i|y|o|u|á|é|í|ý|ó|ú|o u;
C = b|d|f|g|h|k|l|m|n|p|s|t|x|z|c h|r|č|ň|ř|š|ž;

LEXICON Root
Prefix;
Noun;
YerVerbOrPrefix;
VerbOrPrefix;
Adjective;

LEXICON Prefix
do-		AnyVerbOrPrefix;
na-     AnyVerbOrPrefix;
ne-		AnyVerbOrPrefix;
o-		VerbOrPrefix;
ob-		VerbOrPrefix;
obe-	YerVerb;
od-		VerbOrPrefix;
ode-	YerVerb;
pa-		AnyVerbOrPrefix;
po-		AnyVerbOrPrefix;
pod-	VerbOrPrefix;
pode-	YerVerbOrPrefix;
pro-	AnyVerbOrPrefix;
pře-	AnyVerbOrPrefix;
při-	AnyVerbOrPrefix;
před-	VerbOrPrefix;
přede-	YerVerb;
roz-	VerbOrPrefix;
roze-	YerVerb;
s-		VerbOrPrefix;
se-		YerVerb;
u-		AnyVerbOrPrefix;
v-		Verb;
vy-		AnyVerbOrPrefix;
vz-		VerbOrPrefix;
za-		AnyVerbOrPrefix;

LEXICON YerVerb
síl		at;
sl		at;
stl		at;
t		nout;

LEXICON Verb
běl		at;
blýsk	at;
cvál	at; ! canter
červen	at;
děl		at;
dum		at;
drás	at;
dým		at;
fouk	at;
ham		at;
hatl	at;
hn		at;
jás		at;
jedn	at;
jím		at;
hlás	at;
kašl	at;
klam	at;
kotl	at;
kous	at;
kys		at;
lys		at;
lám		at;
lousk	at;
lul		at;
lusk	at;
matl	at;
míl		at;
mrsk	at;
pás		at;
patl	at;
písk	at;
plesk	at;
plísk	at;
prásk	at;
prsk	at;
prýsk	at;
rous	at;
sál		at;
ston	at;
stýl	at;
tisk	at;
tlesk	at;
toul	at; ! wander
třesk	at;
trysk	at;
tutl	at;
vol		at; ! call
zelen	at;
žehn	at;
žmoul	at; ! munch, chew; crumple
žvatl	at;
bíl		it;
cíl		it;
cít		it; ! feel
honos	it;
chod	it;
jezd	it;
koup	it;
kus		it;
krm		it;
lom		it;
mluv	it;
pál		it;
píl		it;
plat	it;
pros	it;
pust	it;
nut		it;
síl		it;
soud	it;
suš		it;
top		it;
tvoř	it;
vař		it; ! cook, boil
věs		it;
věz		it;
běž		et;
drž		et;
lež		et;
mus		et; ! must, have to
slyš	et;
vrac	et;
sed		ět;
trp		ět;
vid		ět;
děk		ovat; ! thank
had		ovat; ! estimate
kaz		ovat; ! show
kup		ovat; ! buy
krač	ovat;
mil		ovat; ! love
oper	ovat;
organiz	ovat;
prac	ovat; ! work
saz		ovat;
sil		ovat;
sled	ovat;
třeb	ovat; ! need
žad		ovat;
bás		nout;
blik	nout;
čís		nout;
fik		nout;
hryz	nout;
klouz	nout;
kous	nout;
křís	nout;
kys		nout;
líz		nout;
máz		nout;
me		nout; ! remember
mek		nout;
mrz		nout;
nik		nout;
pás		nout;
pláz	nout;
řek		nout;
říz		nout;
sek		nout;
šmik	nout;
tek		nout;
tisk	nout; ! press
trs		nout;
táh		nout; ! pull
pad		nout; ! fall
vlád	nout; ! rule
vrz		nout;
nes		t;
ved		t;

LEXICON V
-b		a;
-iv		o;

LEXICON VerbOrPrefix
Verb;
Prefix;

LEXICON AnyVerbOrPrefix
AnyVerb;
Prefix;

LEXICON AnyVerb
YerVerb;
Verb;

LEXICON Noun
<C+ V C> u;
brod    u;
čas		u;
fax		u;
jih		u; ! south
les		u;
pod-zim	u; ! autumn
řád		u;
sever	u; ! north
střed	u; ! centre, middle
svět	u;
syr		u;
vlas	u;
vý-chod	u; ! east
zá-pad	u; ! west
<C+ V C> a;
cen		a;
hlav	a;
pus     a;
řad		a;
řek		a;
sír		a; ! sulphur
škol	a;
špin	a; ! dirt
vod		a;
růž		e; ! rose
zim		a; ! winter
<C+ V C> o;
blát	o;
dlát	o;
jar		o; ! spring
kopyt	o;
koryt	o;
lét		o; ! summer
měst	o;
míst	o;
cíl		i;


LEXICON N
-av		y;
-ov		y;
-n		í;
-n		y;

LEXICON Adjective
cel		y;
čist	y;
hezk	y;
dobr	y; ! good
jedin	y;
krásn	y; ! beautiful
mal		y;
mlad	y;
mnoh	y;
nov		y;
oškliv	y; ! ugly
pěkn	y;
pevn	y;
rad		y;
rovn	y;
rychl	y;
slab	y;
star	y;
špatn	y; ! bad
tuh		y;
velk	y; ! big
vesel	y;
zdatn	y;
zl		y; ! evil, nasty
žád		y;
! Названия цветов
bíl		y;
čern	y;
červen	y;
fialov	y; ! purple
hněd	y; ! brown
modr	y; ! blue
oranžov	y;
šed		y; ! grey
šediv	y; ! grey
zelen	y; ! green
žlut	y; ! yellow
ciz		í; ! foreign

LEXICON A
-ost	i;

! Классы глаголов

LEXICON at
-a		InfStem;
-á		NewPresent;
V;

LEXICON it
-i		InfStem;
-í		NewPresent;
-j		et;
V;

LEXICON et
-e		InfStem;
-í		NewPresent;
V;

LEXICON ět
-ě		InfStem;
-í		NewPresent;
V;

LEXICON ovat
-ova	InfStem;
-uj		OldPresent;
-uje	CommonPresent;
V;

LEXICON nout
-nou	Inf;
-nu		Past;
-n		OldPresent;
-ne		CommonPresent;
V;

LEXICON t
		InfStem;
		OldPresent;
0:-e	CommonPresent;
V;

! Спряжение глаголов

LEXICON InfStem
Inf;
Past;

LEXICON Inf
-t		#;

LEXICON Past
-l		PastEndings;

LEXICON PastEndings
		#;
-a		#;
-o		#;
-i		#;
-y		#;
-a		#;

LEXICON NewPresent
+1+Sg:-m	#;
			CommonPresent;

LEXICON OldPresent
+1+Sg:-u	#;
+3+Pl:-ou	#;

LEXICON CommonPresent
+2+Sg:-š	#;
+3+Sg:0		#;
+1+Pl:-me	#;
+2+Pl:-te	#;

! Склонение прилагательных

LEXICON y
+Masc+Nom+Sg:-ý		#;
+Fem+Nom+Sg:-á		#;
+Neut+Nom+Sg:-é		#;
A;

LEXICON í
+Nom+Sg:-í			#;
A;

! Склонение существительных

LEXICON a
+Nom+Sg:-a		#;
+Acc+Sg:-u		#;
+Gen+Sg:-y		#;
+Dat+Sg:-ě		#;
+Loc+Sg:-ě		#;
+Ins+Sg:-ou		#;
+Voc+Sg:-o		#;
+Nom+Pl:-y      #;
+Acc+Pl:-y		#;
+Gen+Pl:0		#;
+Dat+Pl:-ám     #;
+Loc+Pl:-ách    #;
+Ins+Pl:-ami    #;
CommonNoun;
N;

LEXICON ovi
CommonMasc;
+Acc+Sg:-a		#;
+Gen+Sg:-a		#;
+Dat+Sg:-ovi	#;
+Loc+Sg:-ovi	#;
CommonMascNeut;
+Nom+Pl:-i		#;
+Nom+Pl:-ové	#;
N;

LEXICON u
CommonMasc;
+Acc+Sg:0		#;
+Gen+Sg:-u		#;
CommonInanMascNeut;
CommonMascNeut;
+Nom+Pl:-y      #;
+Acc+Pl:-y		#;
N;

LEXICON o
+Nom+Sg:-o      #;
+Acc+Sg:-o		#;
+Gen+Sg:-a      #;
CommonInanMascNeut;
CommonMascNeut;
+Nom+Pl:-a		#;
+Acc+Pl:-a		#;
+Gen+Pl:0		#;
CommonNoun;
N;

LEXICON CommonMasc
+Nom+Sg:0		#;
+Voc+Sg:-e		#;
+Gen+Pl:-ů		#;

LEXICON CommonInanMascNeut
+Dat+Sg:-u      #;
+Loc+Sg:-ě      #;
+Loc+Sg:-u      #;

LEXICON CommonMascNeut
+Ins+Sg:-em		#;
+Dat+Pl:-ům		#;
+Loc+Pl:-ech	#;
+Ins+Pl:-y		#;

LEXICON CommonNoun
+Ins+Pl:-ama	#;

LEXICON e
N;

LEXICON i
+Nom+Sg:0		#;
+Acc+Sg:0		#;
+Gen+Sg:-ě		#;
+Dat+Sg:-i		#;
+Loc+Sg:-i		#;
+Ins+Sg:-í		#;
+Voc+Sg:-i		#;
+Nom+Pl:-ě      #;
+Acc+Pl:-ě		#;
+Gen+Pl:-í		#;
+Dat+Pl:-ím     #;
+Loc+Pl:-ích    #;
+Ins+Pl:-ěmi    #;
+Ins+Pl:-ěma    #;
N;
